Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-11] Powers on whom conferred;
delegation of powers. (a) Except as otherwise expressly provided, all of
the powers conferred by this chapter are conferred on the governor or mayor, as
applicable. The governor or mayor may delegate any of these powers to
governmental, private-sector, and nonprofit agencies and organizations,
officials, officers, employees, and other individuals created, appointed, or
employed under, or engaged in carrying out this chapter; provided that the
following powers shall be retained by the governor or mayor, as applicable:

(1) Proclaiming a state of emergency or local state
of emergency, proclaiming a state of emergency or local state of emergency
terminated, or making any other proclamation provided for by this chapter;

(2) Prescribing rules having the force and effect of
law; and

(3) Making allotments of funds appropriated or
available for the purposes of this chapter.

Unless otherwise directed by the governor or mayor,
all of the powers pertaining to emergency management authorized to be delegated
by the governor or mayor shall be deemed to have been delegated by the governor
to the director of Hawaii emergency management and by the mayor to the
administrator or director of the county emergency management agency, as applicable,
and the administrator or director of the county emergency management agency,
respectively, shall have the authority to further delegate any of these powers
to any agency or person to whom the governor or mayor could have directly
delegated such powers.

(b) The powers conferred upon the governor or
mayor by this chapter are in addition to any other powers or authority
conferred upon the governor or mayor by the laws of the United States and of
the State or county for the same or a like purpose, and shall not be construed
as abrogating, limiting, or modifying any such powers or authority. [L 2014, c
111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next